Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.360

Comprehensive plan—Cooperation with affected agencies.

During the formulation of the comprehensive plan, and especially in developing a specialized element of such comprehensive plan, the planning agency may cooperate to the extent it deems necessary with such authorities, departments or agencies as may have jurisdiction over the territory or facilities for which plans are being made, to the end that maximum correlation and coordination of plans may be secured and properly located sites for all public purposes may be indicated on the comprehensive plan.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.360. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 36.]